North Carolina statutes. Chapter 59. Partnership.
Part 7. Assignment of Partnership Interest.

§ 59-701.
Nature of partnership interest.

A partnership interest is personal property.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Creation of North Carolina’s Limited Liability Corporation Act,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 179 (1997).

§ 59-702.
Assignment of partnership interest.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partnership interest is assignable in whole or in part. Subject to G.S. 59-801(3) an assignment of a partnership interest does not dissolve a limited partnership or entitle the assignee to become or to exercise any rights of a partner. An assignment entitles the assignee to receive, to the extent assigned, only the allocation and distribution to which the assignor would be entitled. Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner ceases to be a partner and to have the power to exercise any rights and powers of a partner upon assignment of all of the partner’s partnership interest. Except as provided in the partnership agreement, neither the pledge or granting of a security interest in any or all of the partnership interest of a partner nor the pledge or granting of a lien or other encumbrance against any or all of the partnership interest of a partner shall cause the partner to cease to be a partner or cease to have the power to exercise any rights or powers of a partner.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1987, c. 531, s. 7; 1999-362, s. 31.

§ 59-703.
Rights of creditor.

On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by any judgment creditor of a partner, the court may charge the partnership interest of the partner with payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment with interest. The general partners shall have no liability to a partner for payments to a judgment creditor pursuant to this provision. To the extent so charged, the judgment creditor has only the rights of an assignee of the partnership interest. This Article does not deprive any partner of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to his partnership interest.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

§ 59-704.
Right of assignee to become limited partner.

An assignee of a partnership interest, including an assignee of a general partner, may become a limited partner if and to the extent that (1) the assignor gives the assignee that right in accordance with authority described in the partnership agreement, or (2) all other partners consent.

An assignee who has become a limited partner has, to the extent assigned, the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a limited partner under the partnership agreement and this Article. An assignee who becomes a limited partner also is liable for the obligations of the assignee’s assignor to make and return contributions as provided in Parts 5 and 6 of this Article. However, the assignee is not obligated for liabilities that (i) are unknown to the assignee at the time the assignee became a limited partner and (ii) could not be ascertained from the written provisions of the partnership agreement.

If an assignee of a partnership interest becomes a limited partner, the assignor is not released from his liability to the limited partnership under

G.S. 59-207

, 59-502, and 59-608.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1999-362, s. 32.

§ 59-705.
Power of estate of deceased or incompetent partner.

If a partner who is an individual dies or a court of competent jurisdiction adjudges him to be incompetent to manage his person or his property, the partner’s executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, or other legal representative may exercise all of the partner’s rights for the purpose of settling his estate or administering his property, including any power the partner had to give an assignee the right to become a limited partner. If a partner is a corporation, trust, or other entity and is dissolved or terminated, the powers of that partner may be exercised by its legal representative or successor.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

§§ 59-706 through 59-800.

Reserved for future codification purposes.